Wyoming, session 2025, SF0153.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-101(a)(xvii) by creating a new
subparagraph (C), by renumbering (C) as (D) and by creating
new paragraphs (xix) and (xx) and 39-13-103(b)(iii)(intro),
by creating a new subparagraph (C) and by renumbering (C)
as (D) are amended to read:

SF0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0715
39-11-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:

(xvii) "Taxable value" means a percent of the
fair market value of property in a particular class as
follows:

(C) Residential real property, including
owner occupied primary residences, nine and one‑half percent
(9.5%);

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, including property valued and assessed under W.S.
39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), nine and one-half percent
(9.5%).

(xix) "Owner occupied primary residence" means
residential real property where the owner of the property
resides for not less than six (6) months of the applicable
tax year;

SF0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0715
(xx) "Residential real property" means real
property improved by a dwelling designed to house not more
than four (4) families and includes associated residential
land up to thirty-five (35) acres where the dwelling is
located if the land is owned by the owner of the dwelling.
The dwelling may be any type of residence including a
single family home, an individual condominium unit, a
mobile home or a trailer if the dwelling is used as a
primary residence.

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(iii) Beginning January 1, 1989, "Taxable value"
means a percent of the fair market value of property in a
particular class as follows:

(C) Residential real property, including
owner occupied primary residences, nine and one‑half percent
(9.5%);

SF0153

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0715
(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

Section 2. This act shall first apply to the tax year
beginning January 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0153